Nebraska, session 109, LB918.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-3103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-3103 (1) Any applicant may apply to the board for state
assistance if (a) the applicant has acquired, constructed, improved, or
equipped an eligible sports arena facility, (b) the applicant has
approved a revenue bond issue or a general obligation bond issue to
acquire, construct, improve, or equip an eligible sports arena facility,
(c) the applicant has adopted a resolution authorizing the applicant to
pursue a general obligation bond issue to acquire, construct, improve, or
equip an eligible sports arena facility, (d) a building permit has been
issued within the applicant's jurisdiction for an eligible sports arena
facility that is a privately owned concert venue, (e) a building permit
has been issued or construction has been completed within the applicant's
jurisdiction for an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately
owned sports complex, or (f) each coapplicant described in subdivision
(1)(b) of section 13-3102 has adopted a resolution authorizing either the
political subdivision or the nonprofit corporation to pursue financing or
bonds to acquire, construct, improve, or equip an eligible sports arena
facility for the purposes set forth in subdivision (4)(b) of this section
13-3103.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant to pay back
amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues of bonds to be
expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve, or equip the
publicly owned eligible sports arena facility and to acquire, construct,
improve, or equip publicly owned nearby parking facilities.
(3) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned
concert venue, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant
(a) to pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more issues
of bonds to be expended by the applicant to acquire, construct, improve,
or equip a nearby parking facility or (b) to promote arts and cultural
-2-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
events which are open to or made available to the general public.
(4) For an eligible sports arena facility that is a privately owned
sports complex, the state assistance shall only be used by the applicant:
(a) To pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more
issues of bonds to be expended by the applicant to acquire, construct,
improve, or equip one or more public infrastructure projects, as defined
in section 77-27,142, related to a privately owned sports complex;
(b) To lease all or a portion of such privately owned sports complex
for the governmental use of the political subdivision. For purposes of
this subdivision, lease means any contractual lease agreement between the
coapplicants described in subdivision (1)(b) of section 13-3102 for the
use of an eligible sports arena facility at fair market rental value for
a term not to exceed twenty years;
(c) To promote sporting events which are open to or made available
to the general public; or
(d) To pay back amounts expended or borrowed through one or more
debt issues to be expended by the nonprofit corporation coapplicant to
acquire, construct, improve, or equip a privately owned sports complex,
subject to voter approval as provided in section 13-3110.
(5)(a) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of the arts
and cultural events shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant
to section 13-3108.
(b) No more than ten years of funding for promotion of sporting
events shall be paid by state assistance received pursuant to section
13-3108.
(c) No more than ten five years of funding for a sports complex
located in a city of the second class or village shall be paid by state
assistance received pursuant to section 13-3108.
(6) For any application for state assistance for a large public
stadium approved on or after July 19, 2024, up to one hundred percent of
the final cost of the project may be funded by state assistance received
-3-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
pursuant to section 13-3108.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3108 (1) The Sports Arena Facility Support Fund is created. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) Upon receiving the certification described in subsection (3)
of section 13-3107, the State Treasurer shall transfer the amount
certified to the fund.
(b) Upon receiving the quarterly certification described in
subsection (4) of section 13-3107, the State Treasurer shall transfer the
amount certified to the fund.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate from the
fund money to be distributed as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section to any political subdivision for which an application for
state assistance under the Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act
has been approved an amount not to exceed:
(i) For any eligible sports arena facility that is not a sports
complex located in a city of the second class or village, seventy percent
of the (A) state sales tax revenue collected by retailers doing business
at eligible sports arena facilities on sales at such facilities, (B)
state sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary box office
sales of admissions to such facilities, and (C) new state sales tax
revenue collected by nearby retailers and sourced under sections
77-2703.01 to 77-2703.04 to the program area; or
(ii) For any eligible sports arena facility that is a sports complex
located in a city of the second class or village, twenty-five percent of
the (A) state sales tax revenue collected by retailers doing business at
eligible sports arena facilities on sales at such facilities, (B) state
sales tax revenue collected on primary and secondary box office sales of
-4-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
admissions to such facilities, and (C) new state sales tax revenue
collected by nearby retailers and sourced under sections 77-2703.01 to
77-2703.04 to the program area.
(b) The amount to be appropriated for distribution as state
assistance to a political subdivision under this subsection for any one
year after the tenth year shall not exceed the highest such amount
appropriated under subdivision (3)(a) of this section during any one year
of the first ten years of such appropriation. If seventy percent of the
state sales tax revenue as described in subdivision (3)(a) of this
section exceeds the amount to be appropriated under this subdivision,
such excess funds shall be transferred to the General Fund. This
subdivision does not apply to any eligible sports arena facility that is
a sports complex located in a city of the second class or village.
(4) The amount certified under subsection (3) of section 13-3107
shall be distributed as state assistance on or before April 15, 2014.
(5) Beginning in 2014, quarterly distributions and associated
transfers of state assistance shall be made. Such quarterly distributions
and transfers shall be based on the certifications provided under
subsection (4) of section 13-3107 and shall occur within fifteen days
after receipt of such certification.
(6)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (6)(b) of this section, the
total amount of state assistance approved for an eligible sports arena
facility shall not exceed one hundred million dollars.
(b) For any eligible sports arena facility that is a large public
stadium:
(i) The total amount of state assistance approved for such facility
shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars;
(ii) The amount of state assistance approved for such facility for
any year shall not exceed one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars;
and
(iii) No state assistance for any large public stadium shall be paid
-5-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
until after July 1, 2027.
(7)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of this
subsection, state assistance to the political subdivision shall no longer
be available upon the retirement of the bonds issued to acquire,
construct, improve, or equip the facility or any subsequent bonds that
refunded the original issue or when state assistance reaches the amount
determined under subdivision (6)(a) of this section, whichever comes
first.
(b) If the state assistance will be used to provide funding for
promotion of the arts and cultural events or for promotion of sporting
events, such state assistance to the political subdivision shall no
longer be available after ten years of funding or when state assistance
reaches the amount determined under subdivision (6)(a) of this section,
whichever comes first.
(c) If the state assistance will be used to provide funding for a
sports complex located in a city of the second class or village, such
state assistance to the political subdivision shall no longer be
available after ten five years of funding or when state assistance
reaches the amount determined under subdivision (6)(a) of this section,
whichever comes first.
(d) If the state assistance will be used to provide funding for a
large public stadium, such state assistance to the political subdivision
shall no longer be available after twenty years of funding or when state
assistance reaches the amount determined under subdivision (6)(b)(i) of
this section, whichever comes first.
(8) State assistance shall not be used for an operating subsidy for
any publicly owned eligible sports arena facility or nearby parking
facility.
(9) The thirty percent of state sales tax revenue remaining after
the appropriation and transfer in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section
shall be appropriated by the Legislature and transferred quarterly as
-6-

LB918 LB918
2026 2026
follows:
(a) If the revenue relates to an eligible sports arena facility that
is a sports complex and that is approved for state assistance under
section 13-3106 on or after May 26, 2021, eighty-three percent of such
revenue shall be transferred to the Support the Arts Cash Fund and
seventeen percent of such revenue shall be transferred to the Convention
Center Support Fund; and
(b) If the revenue relates to any other eligible sports arena
facility, such revenue shall be transferred to the Civic and Community
Center Financing Fund.
(10) The seventy-five percent of state sales tax revenue remaining
after the appropriation and transfer in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this
section shall be distributed in accordance with section 77-27,132.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section for a
city of the primary class, any municipality that has applied for and
received a grant of assistance under the Civic and Community Center
Financing Act shall not receive state assistance under the Sports Arena
Facility Financing Assistance Act for the same project for which the
grant was awarded under the Civic and Community Center Financing Act.
(12) A city of the primary class shall not be eligible to receive a
grant of assistance from the Civic and Community Center Financing Act if
the city has applied for and received a grant of assistance under the
Sports Arena Facility Financing Assistance Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 13-3108, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 13-3103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-